Tennessee, session 114, SB1334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-104-115(b)(2), is amended by
deleting the language "within ten (10) days" and substituting "within fourteen (14) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1334
003385
- 1 -